Maryland, session 2025, SB0621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–206.
(A) THERE IS A MINIMUM ADEQUATE SECURITY STANDARD FOR
COURTROOM SECURITY AT ALL COURTHOUSE FACILITIES IN THE STATE.
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, A COURT SECURITY OFFICER MUST
MEET THE QUALIFICATIONS FOR A SPECIAL POLICE OFFICER, AS DEFINED IN §
3–301 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(C) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THERE SHALL BE PRESENT IN EVERY
COURTROOM DURING PROCEEDINGS AT LEAST:
(1) ONE COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR ANY CRIMINAL, FAMILY, OR
JUVENILE PROCEEDING;
(2) TWO COURT SECURITY OFFICERS FOR ANY PROCEEDING
INVOLVING AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE
REMANDED TO CUSTODY AS A RESULT OF THE PROCEEDING; AND
(3) ONE ADDITIONAL COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR EVERY FOUR OR
FEWER COURTROOMS ON EACH FLOOR OF A COURTHOUSE.
– 1 –

Ch. 141 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, THERE SHALL BE PRESENT IN EVERY
COURTROOM DURING PROCEEDINGS AT LEAST:
(1) ONE COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR ANY PROCEEDING;
(2) TWO COURT SECURITY OFFICERS FOR ANY PROCEEDING
INVOLVING AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE
REMANDED TO CUSTODY AS A RESULT OF THE PROCEEDING; AND
(3) ONE ADDITIONAL COURT SECURITY OFFICER FOR EVERY FOUR OR
FEWER COURTROOMS ON EACH FLOOR OF A COURTHOUSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND, That, on or before September 30, 2025,
each law enforcement agency, department, or entity providing security at a courthouse
facility shall submit a report to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland and,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly
identifying:
(1) the current number of court security officers available to provide
courthouse security;
(2) the minimum number of court security officers necessary to meet the
minimum adequate security standards, accounting for annual leave and absences,
sufficient to ensure that:
(i) all court security officers meet the standards for a special police
officer under Title 3, Subtitle 3 of the Public Safety Article;
(ii) at least one court security officer is present for each court
proceeding;
(iii) at least two court security officers are present for each court
proceeding at which an individual who is or may be incarcerated is present; and
(iv) there is at least one additional court security officer for every four
courtrooms on each floor of a courthouse;
(3) the current number of courthouse security positions for which funding
has been allocated;
(4) the current number of vacancies in the agency, department, or entity;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 141
(5) a viable plan to meet the minimum adequate security standards under
Section 1 of this Act identified under item (2) of this Section; and
(6) any obstacles to the agency, department, or entity meeting those
minimum adequate security standards.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –